District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.40

Approval by third persons.

(a)

The articles of incorporation may require that an amendment to the articles be approved in the form of a record by a specified person or group of persons in addition to the board of directors and members.

(b)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may require that an amendment to the bylaws be approved in the form of a record by a specified person or group of persons in addition to the board of directors and members.

(c)

A requirement in the articles of incorporation or bylaws described in subsection (a) or (b) of this section shall only be amended with the approval in the form of a record of the specified person or group of persons.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-409.04 and § 29-410.02.